Kentucky, session 2026RS, HB557.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 441.005 is amended to read as follows:
As used in this chapter, unless the context otherwise requires:
(1) "Commissioner" means the commissioner of the Department of Corrections;
(2) "Department" means the Department of Corrections;
(3) "Holdover facility" means any detention facility housing prisoners for a
maximum period of ninety-six (96) continuous hours and excluding times when a
prisoner is released for a minimum of seven (7) hours for the purpose of working
at his or her employment, attending an educational institution, or conducting
other business pursuant to a court order, or when a prisoner is released for in
court proceedings;
(4) "Jail" means county jails and correctional or detention facilities, including
correctional facilities as defined in KRS 67B.020 and juvenile detention facilities,
operated by and under the supervision of any political subdivision;
(5) "Jail personnel" means deputy jailers, matrons, cooks, and other food service
personnel, and other jail employees involved in the supervision, custody, care, or
treatment of prisoners in jails, but does not include maintenance or clerical
personnel;[
(2) "Holdover" means any jail housing prisoners for a maximum period of ninety-six
(96) continuous hours and excluding times when a prisoner is released for a
minimum of seven (7) hours for the purpose of working at his or her employment,
attending an educational institution, or conducting other business pursuant to a
court order, or when a prisoner is released for in court proceedings;]
(6)[(3)] "Prisoner" means any person confined in jail pursuant to any code, ordinance,
law, or statute of any unit of government and who is:
(a) Charged with or convicted of an offense;[ or]
Page 1 of 35
XXXX 2/3/2026 1:06 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1155
(b) Held for extradition or as a material witness; or
(c) Confined for any other reason;[
(4) "Unit of government" means that unit of government including the United States
government whose law, statute, ordinance, or code a prisoner is charged with
violating. If a person is imprisoned for contempt of court, the state shall be deemed
the responsible unit of government;
(5) "Department" means the Department of Corrections;
(6) "Jail personnel" means deputy jailers, matrons, cooks, and other food service
personnel, and other jail employees involved in the supervision, custody, care, or
treatment of prisoners in jails but does not include maintenance or clerical
personnel;
(7) "Regional jail" means a jail which is:
(a) Owned and operated by one (1) county and, on a regular basis, holds prisoners for
another county or for the state; or
(b) Owned and operated by two (2) or more counties through a regional jail authority as
provided in KRS 441.800;
(8) "Commissioner" means the commissioner of the Department of Corrections; and
(9) ]"Reentry center" means a supervised community residential facility operated by a
local correctional facility, county jail, or regional jail as detailed in KRS 441.146;[.]
(8) "Regional jail" means a jail which is:
(a) Owned and operated by one (1) county and, on a regular basis, holds
prisoners for another county or for the state; or
(b) Owned and operated by two (2) or more counties through a regional jail
authority as provided in KRS 441.800;
(9) "Restricted custody center" means a facility or area separate from the jail used
for the housing of:
(a) Sentenced prisoners who have been approved by the court for educational,
Page 2 of 35
XXXX 2/3/2026 1:06 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1155
work, or program participation release; and
(b) Prisoners being held pretrial who have been approved by the court for
educational, work, or program participation release; and
(10) "Unit of government" means that unit of government including the United States
government whose law, statute, ordinance, or code a prisoner is charged with
violating. If a person is imprisoned for contempt of court, the state shall be
deemed the responsible unit of government.
SECTION 2. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 441 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) The department shall, for those counties that elect to operate a holdover facility,
promulgate administrative regulations in accordance with KRS Chapter 13A
establishing:
(a) Minimum standards for the operation of holdover facilities that shall
include but not be limited to:
1. Health and safety conditions;
2. Fire safety;
3. Operations, recordkeeping, and administration;
4. Curriculum of basic and continuing training for holdover personnel;
5. Custody, care, and treatment of prisoners;
6. Medical care; and
7. Holdover facility equipment, renovation, and construction;
(b) A holdover facility standards review process that shall:
1. Include the participation of persons knowledgeable of holdover facility
operations; and
2. Require standards to be reviewed at least once every two (2) years;
(c) The process for a county to convert a full-service jail or other jail that does
not house state prisoners to a holdover facility;
Page 3 of 35
XXXX 2/3/2026 1:06 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1155
(d) That holdover facilities shall not be required to meet the minimum bed
requirements under Section 11 of this Act; and
(e) That the jailer of the county where the holdover facility is located, with the
assistance of his or her deputies, shall have custody, rule, and charge of the
holdover facility and all persons housed in the holdover facility.
(2) Administrative regulations promulgated under this section shall not be more
stringent than those promulgated for facilities that do not house state prisoners.
SECTION 3. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 441 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, the department shall
contract with the fiscal court of a county or the regional jail authority to provide
correctional services to state prisoners in the jail or regional jail that stipulate to
the requirements of subsection (4) of this section and elect to house state
prisoners. A contract under this section shall not exceed a term of twenty-four
(24) months.
(2) (a) The per diem rate agreed to in a contract under this section shall at least
equal the actual cost of the jail or regional jail to provide correctional
services to state prisoners at the time of the execution of the contract.
(b) The cost of routine medical, dental, and psychological care shall be factored
into the actual cost described under paragraph (a) of this subsection.
(3) The department shall collaborate with the Finance and Administration Cabinet
to:
(a) Develop an audit and contract compliance system;
(b) Negotiate feasible, reasonable, and understandable contracts with jails and
regional jails; and
(c) Ensure both parties are complying with the terms of the contract.
(4) A contract under this section shall include terms which comply with at least the
Page 4 of 35
XXXX 2/3/2026 1:06 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1155
following:
(a) A person sentenced to a term of imprisonment for a felony shall be
considered a state prisoner;
(b) The department shall:
1. Perform semiannual inspections;
2. Be financially responsible for any maintenance medications and any
necessary medical, dental, or psychological care, beyond routine care
and diagnostic services, of state prisoners held in the jail or regional
jail; and
3. Provide the manner in which programming to state prisoners provided
under paragraph (c)7. of this subsection shall be evaluated and a fee
at least equal to the actual cost to be paid by the department to the jail
or regional jail for each program; and
(c) The jail or regional jail shall:
1. Operate in accordance with this chapter and administrative
regulations promulgated by the department;
2. Ensure that a:
a. Registered nurse, practical nurse, or advanced practice
registered nurse licensed under KRS Chapter 314; or
b. Physician or osteopath licensed under KRS Chapter 311;
is present at the jail or regional jail a portion of each day;
3. Ensure that mental health services are available to state prisoners;
4. Submit monthly reports to the department in an electronic format, on
forms supplied by the department, in accordance with KRS 441.105;
5. Provide a mattress for each state prisoner;
6. Provide state prisoners with access to exercise and recreational
activities, including at least one (1) hour a day of time outside of the
Page 5 of 35
XXXX 2/3/2026 1:06 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1155
state prisoner's cell when conditions permit;
7. a. Provide programming to state prisoners that shall include but
not be limited to:
i. Substance abuse and detoxification treatment;
ii. Cognitive behavioral treatment;
iii. Reentry services; and
iv. An educational program which, upon successful
completion, shall result in the issuance of a High School
Equivalency Diploma.
b. Programming required under this subparagraph may be:
i. Provided onsite or offsite of the facility;
ii. Conducted by jail or regional jail staff or through
volunteers or contractors; and
8. Develop and conduct training and professional development for jail or
regional jail staff.
SECTION 4. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 441 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
Prisoners being held for a nonviolent or nonsexual misdemeanor conviction in a jail or
regional jail may be housed in a restricted custody center.
SECTION 5. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 441 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) (a) Except for:
1. A court-ordered transfer pursuant to Section 13 of this Act or KRS
441.540;
2. Treatment for medical purposes under KRS 441.560;
3. Transfers initiated by the department under Section 15 of this Act; and
4. Any other emergency circumstances, including but not limited to the
Page 6 of 35
XXXX 2/3/2026 1:06 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1155
transfer of inmates who pose an imminent security concern or
imminent risk to the safety of other inmates or jail personnel;
a jailer of a jail holding a prisoner convicted of a Class C or Class D felony
shall not arrange to transfer that prisoner to another jail under his or her
own authority, either permanently or temporarily, without first requesting
permission to do so in writing from the commissioner or the commissioner's
designee. Except as provided in paragraph (b) of this subsection, a transfer
shall not occur prior to the commissioner's or commissioner's designee's
affirmative response.
(b) If a prisoner is transferred to another jail due to an emergency, the jailer
shall submit documentation describing the reason for the transfer to the
commissioner or the commissioner's designee within twenty-four (24) hours
of the emergency transfer.
(2) The department shall establish procedures through the promulgation of
administrative regulations in accordance with KRS Chapter 13A to administer
this section.
SECTION 6. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 441 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) (a) There is hereby established in the State Treasury a trust and agency
account to be known as the regional jail authority construction fund. The
fund shall consist of moneys received from state appropriations, gifts,
grants, and federal funds.
(b) The fund shall be administered by the department.
(c) Amounts deposited in the fund shall be used for the purposes described in
this section.
(d) Notwithstanding KRS 45.229, fund amounts not expended at the close of a
fiscal year shall not lapse but shall be carried forward into the next fiscal
Page 7 of 35
XXXX 2/3/2026 1:06 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1155
year.
(2) (a) The department shall establish procedures by which a regional jail
authority established under KRS 441.800 may apply for funding of capital
construction of new facilities or expansions and improvements to existing
facilities to be considered for grants from the regional jail authority
construction fund.
(b) A regional jail authority established under KRS 441.800 may submit to the
department for consideration for funding from the regional jail authority
construction fund those projects that have received approval or tentative
approval from the Local Correctional Facilities Construction Authority
under Section 12 of this Act.
(c) 1. A regional jail authority established under KRS 441.800 shall submit
projects for consideration for grants from the regional jail authority
construction fund to the department on or before September 1, 2027,
and biennially thereafter.
2. A project submitted in a previous year that was not selected may be
resubmitted under a new application in order to be considered in a
future year.
(3) On or before October 1, 2027, and biennially thereafter, the department shall
submit to the Legislative Research Commission a list of all project grant requests
that meet the requirements under subsection (2)(b) of this section. The list shall,
at minimum, include the documentation required in Section 12 of this Act.
(4) The General Assembly shall make the final determination of which projects are
to be awarded grants from the regional jail authority construction fund under
this section.
SECTION 7. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 441 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
Page 8 of 35
XXXX 2/3/2026 1:06 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1155
(1) (a) There is hereby established in the State Treasury a trust and agency
account to be known as the regional jail conversion fund. The fund shall
consist of moneys received from state appropriations, gifts, grants, and
federal funds.
(b) The fund shall be administered by the department.
(c) Amounts deposited in the fund shall be used for the purposes described in
this section.
(d) Notwithstanding KRS 45.229, fund amounts not expended at the close of a
fiscal year shall not lapse but shall be carried forward into the next fiscal
year.
(2) (a) The department shall provide a grant of one million dollars ($1,000,000) to
each fiscal court that:
1. Establishes a new regional jail authority under KRS 441.800; or
2. Becomes a member of an existing regional jail authority.
(b) Payments shall be made when the department certifies that the county has
begun housing prisoners at the regional jail.
(c) The grant received under paragraph (a) of this subsection shall be deposited
in the county's jail fund.
(d) If a fiscal court consolidates and receives a grant under paragraph (a) of
this subsection, the fiscal court shall remain in the regional jail authority
for at least ten (10) years.
(e) 1. The department shall confirm at least annually that the fiscal court
remains in the regional jail authority as required under paragraph (d)
of this subsection.
2. If the department finds that the fiscal court is no longer a member of
that regional jail authority, the department shall require the fiscal
court to repay the grant on a pro rata basis to the amount of time
Page 9 of 35
XXXX 2/3/2026 1:06 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1155
remaining on the ten (10) year period under paragraph (d) of this
subsection.
(f) A fiscal court shall only be eligible to receive the grant under paragraph (a)
of this subsection once.
(3) (a) The department shall provide a grant of five hundred thousand dollars
($500,000) to each fiscal court that is a member of a regional jail authority
as of the effective date of this Act that accepts a new regional jail authority
member.
(b) The grant received under paragraph (a) of this subsection shall be deposited
in the county's jail fund.
(c) A fiscal court that is a member of a regional jail authority as of the effective
date of this Act shall only be eligible for the grant under paragraph (a) of
this subsection once.
Section 8. KRS 431.215 is amended to read as follows:
(1) If the judgment imposes a sentence for a felony conviction[of death or confinement
in the penitentiary, county jail or other institution], two (2) certified copies of the
judgment[thereof] shall be furnished immediately[forthwith] to the sheriff who
shall execute the same by delivering the defendant and a certified copy of the
judgment to the person in charge of the penitentiary, jail, or institution of
confinement and making a written return thereof in the office of the circuit clerk
within ten (10) days after the execution.
(2) (a) When the judgment imposes a sentence for a felony conviction[of death or
confinement in the penitentiary], the county responsible for the incarceration
of the prisoner as described in Section 9 of this Act[in which the prisoner is
incarcerated] shall receive from the State Treasury:
1. For counties that have entered into a contract with the Department of
Corrections under Section 3 of this Act, a fee per day as determined by
Page 10 of 35
XXXX 2/3/2026 1:06 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1155
the contract; or
2. For counties that have not entered into a contract with the Department
of Corrections under Section 3 of this Act, a fee per day based on the
county's actual cost to house and care for prisoners.
(b) The fee described in paragraph (a) of this subsection shall be paid:
1. Beginning on the day on which judgment was rendered and ending the
day that the defendant is delivered to the penitentiary; and
2. If the sentence includes in whole or in part, the amount of time served
prior to the judgment, beginning on the day the defendant was
arrested for each calendar day the defendant was lodged in a county
or regional jail.
(c) The fee shall be paid to the county treasurer for use for the incarceration of
prisoners as provided in KRS 441.025.
Section 9. KRS 441.025 is amended to read as follows:
(1) The fiscal court of each county shall provide for the incarceration of prisoners
arrested in the county or sentenced or held by order of the courts in the county.
(2) The fiscal court shall provide for the incarceration of prisoners by:
(a) Providing and maintaining a facility that complies with KRS 441.055;
(b) Providing and maintaining a safe, secure, and clean jail in the county; or that
complies with the health and life safety standards defined in KRS 441.055;
(c) 1. Contracting with another county [or a city ]for the incarceration and care
of its prisoners; and
2. Providing for the transportation of prisoners, as provided for in KRS
441.505 and 441.510 including the provision of vehicles, drivers, and
guards.
(3) [Nothing in ]This section shall not prohibit a county from:
(a) Providing holdover facilities that meet the requirements of Section 2 of this
Page 11 of 35
XXXX 2/3/2026 1:06 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1155
Act for holding prisoners for limited periods of time and contracting with
another county [or a city ]for longer periods of incarceration; or
(b) Contracting with the department to provide correctional services to
prisoners serving sentences for felony offenses in accordance with Section 3
of this Act.
(4) Any county may enter into an agreement pursuant to KRS 65.210 to 65.300 to
provide or to use jail facilities.
Section 10. KRS 441.045 is amended to read as follows:
(1) The county governing body shall prescribe rules for the government, security,
safety, and cleanliness of the jail and the comfort and treatment of prisoners,
provided the[such] rules are consistent with state law. The county judge/executive
may inspect the jail at any reasonable time.
(2) Willful violation of the rules promulgated pursuant to subsection (1) of this section
shall be deemed a violation.
(3) Except as provided in subsections (4) and (5) of this section, the cost of providing
necessary medical, dental, and psychological care for indigent prisoners in the jail
shall be paid from the jail budget.
(4) The cost of providing necessary medical, dental, or psychological care for prisoners
of the United States government shall be paid as provided by contract between the
United States government and the county or as may otherwise be provided by
federal law.
(5) (a) The cost of providing:
1. Maintenance medication;
2. Necessary medical, dental, or psychological care, beyond routine care;
and
3. Diagnostic services;[,]
for prisoners held pursuant to a contractual agreement with the state shall be
Page 12 of 35
XXXX 2/3/2026 1:06 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1155
paid [as provided by contract between the state and county. The costs of
necessary medical, dental, or psychological care, beyond routine care and
diagnostic services, of prisoners held in the jail for which the county receives
a per diem payment shall be paid ]by the state.
(b) To the extent that federal law allows and federal financial participation is
available, for the limited purpose of implementing this section, the jail, the
department, or the department's designee is authorized to act on behalf of an
inmate for purposes of applying for Medicaid eligibility.
(6) The cost of providing necessary medical, dental, or psychological care for prisoners
held pursuant to a contractual agreement with another county [or a city ]shall be
paid as provided by contract between the counties[county or city and county].
(7) (a) When the cost of necessary medical, dental, or psychological care for a
prisoner exceeds one thousand dollars ($1,000), as calculated by using the
maximum allowable costs to similar persons or facilities for the same or
similar services under the Kentucky Medical Assistance Program, the state
shall reimburse the county for that portion of the costs that exceeds one
thousand dollars ($1,000). The reimbursement shall be subject to the
following terms and conditions:
1. The care is necessary as defined in subsection (10) of this section;
2. The prisoner is indigent as defined in subsection (8) of this section, or is
uninsured; and
3. [No ]State reimbursement to the county for care provided by physicians,
hospitals, laboratories, or other health care providers shall not exceed
the maximum payments allowed to similar persons or facilities for the
same or similar services under the Kentucky Medical Assistance
Program, except as provided in subsection (11) of this section.
(b) A county may assign its ability to receive payment from the state under this
Page 13 of 35
XXXX 2/3/2026 1:06 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1155
subsection to the person providing the medical, dental, or psychological care
to the prisoner, which assignment shall be accepted by the provider for the
purposes of submitting billing directly to the state. The state shall pay or deny
a claim submitted to it within ninety (90) days of receiving the claim. The
county shall include with the assignment the information required by
subsection (8) of this section necessary to qualify the prisoner as indigent. The
provider shall bill for any other public or private health benefit plan or health
insurance benefits available to the prisoner prior to billing the state under this
subsection, and shall bill the state prior to billing the county. The county shall
retain ultimate payment responsibility as established under subsection (3) of
this section, and the provider may bill the county for payment after the
expiration of ninety (90) days from the date the provider submitted the claim
to the state for payment if the claim remains unpaid at that time.
(8) (a) The determination of whether a prisoner is indigent shall be made pursuant to
KRS 31.120, and may be evidenced by the affidavit of indigency required by
that statute or the appointment of a public defender under that statute. The
prisoner shall not be considered indigent, in the case of prisoner medical care,
if:
1. The prisoner has funds on his or her inmate account to cover all or a
portion of his or her medical expenses;
2. The prisoner's medical expenses are covered on a medical insurance
policy; or
3. The prisoner has the private resources to pay for the use of the medical
facilities.
(b) Prisoners who are later determined not to have been indigent, or who at a time
following treatment are no longer indigent, shall be required to repay the costs
of payments made pursuant to this section to the unit of government which
Page 14 of 35
XXXX 2/3/2026 1:06 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1155
made the payment.
(9) The terms and conditions relating to any determination of nonindigency and
demands for repayment shall be under the same terms and conditions as are
provided under KRS Chapters 31 and 431 relating to similar circumstances in the
program for defense of indigents by the public advocate.
(10) As used in[For the purposes of] this section, "necessary care" means care of a
nonelective nature that cannot be postponed until after the period of confinement
without hazard to the life or health of the prisoner.
(11) Any money appropriated for a given fiscal year to fund the state's obligation under
subsection (7) of this section which remains unspent at the end of the year shall not
lapse but shall be made available to satisfy, to the maximum extent possible, that
portion of each catastrophic claim made during said year above the threshold
amount for which the county did not receive state assistance pursuant to subsection
(7) of this section. In the event there is an insufficient surplus to satisfy said balance
of all such catastrophic claims which are made during that year, the state shall pay
to those qualified counties, on a per claim basis, an amount equal to each claim's
percentage of the total surplus. Should the surplus be sufficient to satisfy all such
catastrophic claims, the amount remaining, if any, shall not lapse but shall be
carried forward to the next fiscal year to be made available for future catastrophic
claims.
(12) Notwithstanding other provisions of this section to the contrary, a jail may impose a
reasonable fee for the use of jail medical facilities by a prisoner who has the ability
to pay for the medical care. These funds may be deducted from the prisoner's
inmate account. A prisoner shall not be denied medical treatment because he or she
has insufficient funds on his or her inmate account. This subsection shall not
preclude other recovery of funds as provided in this section.
(13) (a) Notwithstanding any other provision of this section to the contrary, a jail may
Page 15 of 35
XXXX 2/3/2026 1:06 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1155
impose a reasonable fee for the use of jail medical facilities by a state prisoner
who has been placed in a jail pursuant to a contract with the department[ of
Corrections] under KRS 532.100 or other statute, and who has the ability to
pay for medical care.
(b) Funds may be deducted from the state prisoner's inmate account at the jail.
(c) A state prisoner shall not be denied medical treatment because he or she has
insufficient funds in his or her inmate account.
(d) This subsection shall not preclude other recovery of funds as provided in this
section.
(e) This subsection does not authorize recovery of funds from a prisoner for
medical care which has been paid or reimbursed by the state pursuant to this
section.
(14) Except as provided in subsection (4) of this section, all payments for necessary
medical, dental, or psychological care for jail, regional jail, or holdover facility
prisoners shall be made at a rate not to exceed the Medicaid rate for the same or
similar services, which shall be paid within thirty (30) days under the provisions of
KRS 65.140 of receiving a claim from the health facility or provider for the item or
service. This subsection shall not obligate the Medicaid program to pay for services
provided to a prisoner.
(15) (a) A peace officer or correctional officer having custody of a person shall not
release the person from custody so that the person may receive treatment from
a health care facility or health care provider, except pursuant to an order
issued by a court of competent jurisdiction which specifically names the
person to receive treatment.
(b) A peace officer or correctional officer having custody of a person may take
the person to a health care facility or health care provider for the purpose of
receiving treatment if a correctional officer remains with the person during the
Page 16 of 35
XXXX 2/3/2026 1:06 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1155
time the person is on the premises of the health care facility or health care
provider, unless the facility or provider consents to the absence of the officer.
(c) A county, urban-county, consolidated local government, charter county,
unified local government, jail, regional jail, holdover facility, local detention
center, or other local correctional facility shall not be responsible for paying
for the medical or other health care costs of a person who is released by a
court of competent jurisdiction, except where the release is for the purpose of
receiving medical or other health care services as evidenced by an order
requiring the person to return to custody upon completion of treatment.
(d) When a county, urban-county, consolidated local government, charter county,
unified local government, jail, regional jail, holdover facility, local detention
center, or other local correctional facility is responsible for paying for medical
or other health care costs under paragraph (c) of this subsection, payment
shall be made only at the Medicaid rate for same or similar services.
(e) As used in[For the purposes of] this subsection, "correctional officer"
includes a:
1. Jailer or deputy jailer;
2. Director or other person in charge of a local detention center, local
correctional facility, or regional jail; and
3. Correctional officer employed by a local detention center, local
correctional facility, or regional jail.
Section 11. KRS 441.420 is amended to read as follows:
(1) A[No] political subdivision of this Commonwealth, combination of subdivisions, or
regional jail authority shall not build a new local correctional facility unless:
(a) The facility meets the approval or complies with the standards and
administrative regulations of the department promulgated under this
chapter[pursuant to KRS 441.055];
Page 17 of 35
XXXX 2/3/2026 1:06 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1155
(b) The construction results in a new facility with:
1. A minimum capacity of one hundred fifty (150) prisoner beds; or
2. If a larger facility is needed, more than one hundred fifty (150) prisoner
beds in fifty (50) bed increments; and
(c) Construction of the local correctional facility is approved by the construction
authority.
(2) Final authority for approval of plans for the construction of a local correctional
facility, or an addition to a local correctional facility shall rest with the construction
authority.
(3) The department shall pay for the architectural plans and engineering services
associated with any new local correctional facility approved or tentatively approved
by the construction authority.
(4) The department may promulgate administrative regulations in accordance with
KRS Chapter 13A to create a fee schedule for architectural plans and engineering
services required for the construction of local correctional facilities. A sample fee
schedule for architectural plans and engineering services may be developed by a
committee consisting of department personnel, architects, and construction
managers.
Section 12. KRS 441.430 is amended to read as follows:
(1) Any political subdivision, or combination of subdivisions, desiring to build a local
correctional facility shall make application, in writing, to the department and the
construction authority for approval of the plans for the local correctional facility not
less than ninety (90) days before the advertising for bids for construction of the
facility, or if bids are not to be let, ninety (90) days before the construction
commences. The application shall include documentation of the items required by
subsection (3) of this section.
(2) The department's jail consultants shall review the application and within thirty (30)
Page 18 of 35
XXXX 2/3/2026 1:06 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1155
days of the department's receipt of the application, make a recommendation to the
construction authority. The construction authority shall make a decision within
sixty (60) days after the department's jail consultants make their recommendation.
The construction authority may delay a final decision on the construction of any
new local correctional facility if the construction authority determines that it has
insufficient information upon which to base a decision. If the construction authority
determines that it has insufficient information upon which to base a decision, a final
decision shall be delayed but shall be made within sixty (60) days after receipt of
the information required by the construction authority. Construction shall not
commence until the requisite approval is obtained.
(3) The construction authority shall not approve the construction of a local correctional
facility unless the political subdivision or combination of subdivisions desiring to
build a local correctional facility proves to the satisfaction of the construction
authority that:
(a) The construction of a new local correctional facility is necessary;
(b) The construction of a new local correctional facility with the number of beds
proposed is necessary;
(c) The political subdivision or combination of political subdivisions has
sufficient bonding and revenue sources to pay the bonded indebtedness of the
proposed local correctional facility;
(d) The number and sources of prisoners for the local correctional facility is
sufficient to maintain the financial viability of the local correctional facility;
(e) The projected operating costs for the local correctional facility are appropriate
to maintain the financial viability of the local correctional facility;
(f) The sources of revenue are sufficient to pay, in addition to the bonded
indebtedness, the operation costs and maintenance for the local correctional
facility;
Page 19 of 35
XXXX 2/3/2026 1:06 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1155
(g) If applicable, there are contracts or interlocal cooperation agreements
specifying details for sharing the liability for the costs of paying the bonded
indebtedness and the operation costs for the local correctional facility;
(h) If applicable, there are contracts or interlocal cooperation agreements
specifying details for the management and operation of the local correctional
facility; and
(i) All information has been provided that the construction authority required
pursuant to administrative regulation.
(4) (a) Upon approval or tentative approval by the construction authority of the new
local correctional facility, or the expansion of an existing correctional facility,
architectural plans shall be submitted to the department for approval. The
department's jail consultants shall review the architectural plans and within
sixty (60) days notify the applicant and the construction authority of their
findings.
(b) The department's jail consultants may delay final approval of the architectural
plans if the jail consultants determine the architectural plans for the facility do
not comply with administrative regulations of the department promulgated
pursuant to KRS 441.055.
(c) If the department determines that it has insufficient information upon which to
make a decision, a final decision shall be delayed but shall be made within
sixty (60) days after receipt of the information requested.
(d) Construction shall not commence until the requisite approvals have been
obtained.
(e) If approval is denied by the department's jail consultants, the political
subdivision or combination of subdivisions requesting the construction or
expansion of a local correctional facility may appeal the decision to the
construction authority.
Page 20 of 35
XXXX 2/3/2026 1:06 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1155
(5) (a) A regional jail authority that meets all of the requirements under subsection
(3) of this section, except for the requirement listed under subsection (3)(c)
of this section, shall receive tentative approval subject to receiving funding
from the regional jail authority construction fund under Section 6 of this
Act or other funding.
(b) Tentative approval shall expire after forty-eight (48) months unless the
funding required under paragraph (a) of this subsection is secured by the
regional jail authority.
Section 13. KRS 441.520 is amended to read as follows:
(1) As used in this section:
(a) "Originating jail" means a jail that has been ordered by the court to transfer
prisoners to a receiving jail; and
(b) "Receiving jail" means a jail that has been ordered by the court to receive
prisoners from an originating jail.
(2) (a) If there is danger or probable danger that any or all prisoners confined in a jail
will be removed from the jail by violence, the Circuit Judge shall order the
transfer of those prisoners to the jail of the nearest county in which the jail is
secure and the prisoners can be safely kept. The order shall include evidence
of the danger or probable danger to the prisoners. When any such order is
made, and a copy is given to the jailer of the receiving jail, he or she shall
receive all such prisoners. If a Circuit Judge is not in the county, the order of
transfer may be made by a District Judge, who shall deliver the order, or a
copy thereof, to the circuit clerk for revision by the Circuit Court.
(b) Except as provided in paragraph (a) of this subsection, before ordering the
transfer of a prisoner from an originating jail to a receiving jail, a Circuit
Judge shall receive a written agreement between the originating and receiving
jails. The written agreement shall specify that the receiving jail has agreed to
Page 21 of 35
XXXX 2/3/2026 1:06 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1155
house the prisoner or prisoners and that the originating jail shall pay the
prisoner's expenses in accordance with subsection (3)(a) and (b) of this
section. If the Circuit Judge orders the transfer before receiving the written
agreement, the receiving jail shall not be required to house the prisoner nor
shall the receiving jail's jailer be subject to contempt for failing to obey the
transfer order.
(3) In the event a prisoner is transferred from an originating jail to a receiving jail, the
receiving jail shall:
(a) Charge no more than [three (3) times the per diem amount determined
according to KRS 431.215(2). However, the per diem rate charged by the
receiving jail shall not exceed ]the combined cost of the prisoner's room and
board, administrative processing or booking, and any evidence-based
programming the prisoner receives;
(b) Perform only medically necessary procedures on the prisoners, as determined
by the receiving jail's medical provider. The originating jail shall be
financially responsible for these medically necessary procedures. If a prisoner
is sent out of the receiving jail for more than eight (8) hours for a medically
necessary procedure, the originating jail shall be financially responsible for all
receiving jail personnel costs related to the prisoner's transportation until the
prisoner is returned to the receiving jail; and
(c) Be no more than two (2) geographically contiguous judicial districts away
from the originating jail.
(4) The sheriff of the county of the originating jail shall be responsible for the
transportation of any prisoners transferred pursuant to this section. For those
prisoners transferred pursuant to subsection (2)(a) of this section, the sheriff shall
transfer the prisoners in accordance with KRS 441.530(2)(a).
(5) To ensure the ongoing safety and security of the prisoners, any Circuit Judge who
Page 22 of 35
XXXX 2/3/2026 1:06 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1155
orders the transfer of a prisoner from an originating jail to a receiving jail shall
review his or her transfer orders every sixty (60) days, with input from the
originating and receiving jails.
Section 14. KRS 441.810 is amended to read as follows:
(1) (a) The regional jail authority shall be composed of members appointed by the
county judges/executive of the respective counties within the authority and the
jailer of each county within the authority[of the county where the regional
jail is located].
(b) The county judge/executive of the most populous county shall appoint three
(3) members to the authority, and the remainder of the county
judges/executive shall each appoint two (2) members.
(2) Members of the authority shall serve four (4) year terms, except that one (1) of each
county judge/executive's original appointees shall serve a two (2) year term.
Members of the authority shall not be compensated for their service but may be
reimbursed for expenses actually incurred.
Section 15. KRS 532.100 is amended to read as follows:
(1) As used in this section, "jail" means a "jail" or "regional jail" as defined in KRS
441.005.
(2) When an indeterminate term of imprisonment is imposed, the court shall commit
the defendant to the custody of the Department of Corrections for the term of his or
her sentence and until released in accordance with the law.
(3) When a definite term of imprisonment is imposed, the court shall commit the
defendant to a jail for the term of his or her sentence and until released in
accordance with the law.
(4) When a sentence of death is imposed, the court shall commit the defendant to the
custody of the Department of Corrections with directions that the sentence be
carried out according to law.
Page 23 of 35
XXXX 2/3/2026 1:06 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1155
(5) (a) Notwithstanding[The provisions of] KRS 500.080(5)[ notwithstanding], if a
Class D felon is sentenced to an indeterminate term of imprisonment of five
(5) years or less, he or she shall serve that term in a jail that has a contract
with the Department of Corrections to house state prisoners as described in
Section 3 of this Act[in a county in which the fiscal court has agreed to house
state prisoners]; except that, when an indeterminate sentence of two (2) years
or more is imposed on a Class D felon convicted of a sexual offense
enumerated in KRS 197.410(1), or a crime under KRS 17.510(12) or (13), the
sentence shall be served in a state institution[. Counties choosing not to
comply with the provisions of this paragraph shall be granted a waiver by the
commissioner of the Department of Corrections].
(b) Notwithstanding[The provisions of] KRS 500.080(5)[ notwithstanding], a
Class D felon who received a sentence of more than five (5) years for
nonviolent, nonsexual offenses, but who currently has less than five (5) years
remaining to be served, may serve the remainder of his or her term in a jail
that has a contract with the Department of Corrections to house state
prisoners as described in Section 3 of this Act[in a county in which the fiscal
court has agreed to house state prisoners].
(c) 1. Notwithstanding[The provisions of] KRS 500.080(5)[ notwithstanding],
and except as provided in subparagraph 2. of this paragraph, a Class C
or D felon with a sentence of more than five (5) years who is classified
by the Department of Corrections as community custody shall serve that
term in a jail that has a contract with the Department of Corrections to
house state prisoners as described in Section 3 of this Act[in a county
in which the fiscal court has agreed to house state prisoners] if:
a. Beds are available in the jail;
b. State facilities are at capacity; and
Page 24 of 35
XXXX 2/3/2026 1:06 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1155
c. Halfway house beds are being utilized at the contract level as of
July 15, 2000.
2. When an indeterminate sentence of two (2) years or more is imposed on
a felon convicted of a sex crime, as defined in KRS 17.500, or any
similar offense in another jurisdiction, the sentence shall be served in a
state institution.[
3. Counties choosing not to comply with the provisions of this paragraph
shall be granted a waiver by the commissioner of the Department of
Corrections.]
(d) Any jail that houses state inmates under this subsection shall offer programs
as recommended by the Jail Standards Commission. The Department of
Corrections shall adopt the recommendations of the Jail Standards
Commission and promulgate administrative regulations establishing required
programs for a jail that houses state inmates under this subsection. The
Department of Corrections shall approve programming offered by jails to state
inmates for sentencing credits in accordance with KRS 197.045.
(e) Before housing any female state inmate, a jail shall be certified pursuant to
KRS 197.020.
(f) 1. a. If a jail is at or over one hundred fifty percent (150%) capacity, the
Department of Corrections may direct the jail to transfer a
specified number of state prisoners to vacant beds at other
designated jails or state institutions. As used in this paragraph,
"capacity" means the capacity listed on the certificate of
occupancy issued each year to the jail by the Department of
Corrections.
b. The Department of Corrections shall choose which state prisoners
are eligible for transfer based on the security level of the vacant
Page 25 of 35
XXXX 2/3/2026 1:06 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1155
bed at the receiving jail or state institution.
c. State prisoners who are approved for transfer to a Department of
Corrections facility for necessary medical treatment and care
pursuant to KRS 441.560 shall not be transferred to another jail.
d. State prisoners enrolled in a Department of Corrections approved
program pursuant to KRS 197.045 shall not be transferred.
e. State prisoners awaiting trial in the county they are being housed
shall not be transferred.
f. Jails that receive state prisoners pursuant to this subparagraph shall
be responsible for the transportation of those prisoners to the jail.
2. If the Department of Corrections directs the transfer of a state prisoner
pursuant to subparagraph 1. of this paragraph, the jailer has fourteen
(14) days to transfer the state prisoner. If the jailer refuses to release
custody of the state prisoner to the receiving jail within fourteen (14)
days, the department shall reduce the per diem for the jail for an amount
equal to the per diem of that prisoner for each day the jailer refuses to
comply with the direction.
3. If the Department of Corrections directs the transfer of a state prisoner
pursuant to subparagraph 1. of this paragraph, the jailer of the receiving
jail shall accept the transfer and transport the state prisoner in
accordance with subparagraph 1.f. of this paragraph. If, after receiving a
copy of the direction, the jailer refuses to accept and transport the state
prisoner, the Department of Corrections shall reduce the per diem for the
receiving jail for an amount equal to the per diem of that prisoner for
each day the jailer refuses to comply with the direction.
4. If a jail has a vacant bed and has a Class C or Class D felon who, based
on the Department of Corrections classification system, is eligible to be
Page 26 of 35
XXXX 2/3/2026 1:06 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1155
housed in that vacant bed, the department may direct the jail to transfer
the state prisoner to that bed. If the jailer refuses to transfer the state
prisoner to the vacant bed, the Department of Corrections shall reduce
the per diem for the jail for an amount equal to the per diem of that
prisoner for each day the jailer refuses to comply with the direction.
5. The per diem reduced pursuant to subparagraph 2., 3., or 4. of this
paragraph shall be enforced by withholding the amount from the per
diem paid to the jail pursuant to KRS 431.215(2).
6. If a jail that is at or over one hundred fifty percent (150%) capacity
requests the transfer of a specified number of state prisoners, the
Department of Corrections may, if vacant beds are available at other
jails, direct the transfer in accordance with subparagraph 1. of this
paragraph.
(g) If a jail has vacant beds in an area of the jail usually reserved for state
prisoners, the jail may house county prisoners in that area.
(6) (a) The jailer of a county in which a Class D felon or a Class C felon is
incarcerated may request the commissioner of the Department of Corrections
to incarcerate the felon in a state corrections institution if the jailer has
reasons to believe that the felon is:
1. An escape risk;[,]
2. A danger to himself or herself or other inmates;[,]
3. An extreme security risk;[,] or
4. Needs protective custody beyond that which can be provided in a jail.
(b) The commissioner of the Department of Corrections shall evaluate the request
and transfer the inmate if he or she deems it necessary. If the commissioner
refuses to accept the felon inmate, and the Circuit Judge of the county that has
jurisdiction of the offense charged is of the opinion that the felon cannot be
Page 27 of 35
XXXX 2/3/2026 1:06 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1155
safely kept in a jail, the Circuit Judge, with the consent of the Governor, may
order the felon transferred to the custody of the Department of Corrections.
(7) [(a) ]Class D felons and Class C felons serving their time in a jail shall be
considered state prisoners, and, except as provided in subsection (5)(f) of this
section, the Department of Corrections shall pay the jail in which the prisoner is
incarcerated a per diem amount determined according to Section 3 of this Act[KRS
431.215(2)]. For other state prisoners and parole violator prisoners, the per diem
payments shall also begin on the date prescribed in KRS 431.215(2), except as
provided in subsection (5)(f) of this section[.
(b) 1. The per diem amount paid to the jail shall be increased by two dollars
($2) per day of program attendance for those inmates enrolled in and
attending evidence-based programs approved by the department and that do
not require instructors to have completed any postsecondary education.
2. The per diem amount paid to the jail shall be increased by ten dollars ($10)
per day of program attendance for those inmates enrolled in and attending
evidence-based programs approved by the department and that require
instructors to have completed particular postsecondary courses.
(c) Any amount beyond the base per diem paid under paragraph (a) of this
subsection that is paid under a contract to the jail for an inmate's attendance at
an evidence-based program shall be credited toward the ten dollars ($10)
increase in per diem required under paragraph (b) of this subsection].
(8) State prisoners, excluding the Class D felons and Class C felons qualifying to serve
time in jails, shall be transferred to the state institution within forty-five (45) days
of final sentencing.
(9) (a) Class D felons eligible for placement in a jail may be permitted by the warden
or jailer to participate in any approved community work program or other
form of work release with the approval of the commissioner of the
Page 28 of 35
XXXX 2/3/2026 1:06 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1155
Department of Corrections.
(b) The authority to release an inmate to work under this subsection may be
exercised at any time during the inmate's sentence, including the period when
the court has concurrent authority to permit work release pursuant to KRS
439.265.
(c) The warden or jailer may require an inmate participating in the program to
pay a fee to reimburse the warden or jailer for the cost of operating the
community work program or any other work release program. The fee shall
not exceed the lesser of fifty-five dollars ($55) per week or twenty percent
(20%) of the prisoner's weekly net pay earned from the community work
program or work release participation. In addition, the inmate may be required
to pay for any drug testing performed on the inmate as a requirement of the
community work program or work release participation.
(d) This subsection shall not apply to an inmate who:
1. Is not eligible for work release pursuant to KRS 197.140;
2. Has a maximum or close security classification as defined by
administrative regulations promulgated by the Department of
Corrections;
3. Is subject to the provisions of KRS 532.043; or
4. Is in a reentry center as defined in KRS 441.005.
Section 16. KRS 196.030 is amended to read as follows:
(1) The department shall, unless otherwise provided by law, exercise all functions of
the state in relation to:
(a) Management of penal, reform, and correctional institutions;
(b) Supervision of probation and parole;
(c) The giving of assistance to other departments, agencies, and institutions of the
state and federal government when requested by performing services in
Page 29 of 35
XXXX 2/3/2026 1:06 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1155
conformity with this section;
(d) Acting as the agent of the federal government in matters of mutual concern,
and in the administration of any federal funds granted to the state to aid in the
performance of any function of this department; and
(e) Administration and enforcement of the provisions of KRS Chapter 441
relating to the development and enforcement of jail standards, training of
jailers and jail personnel, and jail planning and construction.
(2) Notwithstanding any other provision of law[provisions] to the contrary, the
Department of Corrections may contract with a county fiscal court or local or
regional correctional authority to house misdemeanants and persons awaiting trial
or sentencing.
(3) Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, the Department of
Corrections shall contract with the county fiscal court or regional jail authority to
provide correctional services to state prisoners in a jail or regional jail in
accordance with Section 3 of this Act.
(4) [The provisions of ]This section shall not apply to any institution, home, or agency
which does not receive aid from the state, a county, or municipality.
Section 17. KRS 441.052 is amended to read as follows:
(1) When a unit of local government or regional jail authority facilitates medical care
for a prisoner confined in the jail, holdover facility, or regional jail who has not
been convicted as a felon and who holds a policy, contract, or certificate of
insurance coverage in any form, the insurer shall be primary for payment of
medically necessary health care benefit claims provided the following conditions
are met:
(a) The reimbursement shall be for medical, dental, or psychological claims that
are covered benefits under the terms and conditions of the health benefit plan
held by the prisoner;
Page 30 of 35
XXXX 2/3/2026 1:06 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1155
(b) The reimbursement shall be applied under the terms and conditions of the
health benefit plan and in the same manner as though the insured were not a
prisoner; and
(c) All premiums for the health benefit plan are current.
(2) If the unit of local government, combination of units of local government, or
regional jail authority has contracted with the Department of Corrections under the
Department of Corrections' contract for medical, dental, or psychological care
access, or drugs, medicines, or pharmaceutical services, then the rights of the local
government, combination of local governments, or regional jail authority shall be
subrogated to the contract provider of such services to the Department of
Corrections.
(3) If the unit of local government, combination of units of local government, or
regional jail authority has, with the approval of the Department of Corrections,
contracted with another pharmaceutical services provider, then the rights of the
local government, combination of local governments, or regional jail authority shall
be subrogated to the contract provider of medical, dental, or psychological care to
the local jail for access to drugs, medicines, or pharmaceutical services to the unit
of local government, combination of units of local government, or regional jail
authority.
(4) If a prisoner has been transferred from a local jail, regional jail, or holdover to the
Department of Corrections for medical care pursuant to KRS 441.560, then the
contract provider of drugs and pharmaceutical services or the contract provider of
medical, dental, or psychological care shall be subrogated to the provider of such
services to the Department of Corrections.
Section 18. KRS 441.053 is amended to read as follows:
(1) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, each jail, regional jail, holdover
facility, or other correctional facility owned or operated by a unit of local
Page 31 of 35
XXXX 2/3/2026 1:06 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1155
government, combination of units of local government, or regional jail authority
shall utilize the Department of Corrections' contract pharmacy plan.
(2) (a) Except as provided in paragraph (b) of this subsection, the Department of
Corrections shall, on a yearly basis, waive the requirement of subsection (1)
of this section if the unit of local government, combination of units of local
government, or regional jail authority proves to the Department of Corrections
that the unit of local government, combination of units of local government,
or regional jail authority has contracted with another vendor and that:
1. The prescription plan covers pharmacy services, drugs, and medicine in
a manner which is equal to or superior to the Department of Corrections'
contract pharmacy plan; and
2. The cost of the prescription plan is equal to or less in total cost,
including the product cost and all other costs associated with the
delivery of the drugs, than the Department of Corrections' contract
pharmacy plan.
(b) If a unit of local government, combination of units of local government, or
regional jail authority contracts with a private provider of comprehensive
health services for inmates, then that private provider may elect not to use the
Department of Corrections' contract pharmacy plan and a waiver under this
subsection shall not be required.
(3) Except as provided in subsection (4) of this section, each jail, regional jail, holdover
facility, or other correctional facility owned or operated by a unit of local
government, combination of units of local government, or regional jail authority
shall utilize the Department of Corrections' contract medical, dental, and
psychological care access plan, and the administrative service fee for the plan shall
be paid by the Department of Corrections subject to the limits of 2007 Ky. Acts
ch. 128, sec. 5.
Page 32 of 35
XXXX 2/3/2026 1:06 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1155
(4) The Department of Corrections may, on a yearly basis, waive the requirement of
subsection (3) of this section if the unit of local government, combination of units
of local government, or regional jail authority proves to the Department of
Corrections that the unit of local government, combination of units of local
government, or regional jail authority has contracted with another vendor and that:
(a) The medical, dental, and psychological care access plan provides services and
access which is equal to or superior to the Department of Corrections' contract
medical, dental, and psychological care access plan; and
(b) The cost of the medical, dental, and psychological care access plan is equal to
or less in cost than the Department of Corrections' contract medical, dental,
and psychological care access plan.
(5) A unit of local government, combination of units of local government, or regional
jail authority may appeal a decision of the Department of Corrections denying a
waiver under subsection (2) or (4) of this section to the secretary of justice and
public safety.
(6) A[No] program specified in this section shall not require or permit reimbursement
at a rate in excess of the Kentucky Medicaid program for the same or similar
services or products but may permit a lesser rate of reimbursement.
Section 19. KRS 441.560 is amended to read as follows:
(1) When a prisoner in a jail, regional jail, or holdover facility is injured, is or becomes
sick or ill, or requires specialized medical care or long-term medical care which is
not available at the local jail, the jailer or other person in charge of the jail, regional
jail, or holdover facility may request that the commissioner of the department, or
the commissioner's designee in writing, transfer the prisoner to a facility operated
by the department or under contract to the department for the provision of necessary
medical treatment and care.
(2) The commissioner, or the commissioner's designee in writing, may authorize the
Page 33 of 35
XXXX 2/3/2026 1:06 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1155
transfer of the prisoner to a facility operated by the department or under contract to
the department for the length of time necessary to secure medical treatment and
care for the prisoner. Following medical care and treatment the prisoner shall be
returned to the jail, regional jail, or holdover facility.
(3) If the commissioner or the commissioner's designee, in writing, authorizes the
transfer of the prisoner to a facility operated by the department or under contract to
the department, then the department shall pay:
(a) The costs of transfer to and from the department's facilities;
(b) The room, board, and related costs for the prisoner while the prisoner is in the
custody of the department; and
(c) The costs for medical care, treatment, medicines, and supplies for the prisoner
while the prisoner is in the custody of the department.
(4) The department shall have no legal duty to transfer any prisoner to the department
for medical treatment and care. The decision of the commissioner or the
commissioner's designee, in writing, whether or not to accept a prisoner for transfer
to the department shall be subject to appeal to the secretary of justice and public
safety.
(5) The department shall promulgate administrative regulations in accordance with
KRS Chapter 13A relating to the transfer of prisoners to the department for medical
treatment and care.
(6) When a prisoner is transferred to the department for medical care and treatment, the
jailer or other person in charge of the jail, regional jail, or holdover facility shall
notify the following persons of the reason for the transfer, the fact of the transfer,
and the general reasons for the transfer:
(a) The prisoner's next of kin;
(b) The prisoner's attorney of record;
(c) The Commonwealth's attorney or county attorney, as appropriate; and
Page 34 of 35
XXXX 2/3/2026 1:06 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1155
(d) The Chief Circuit Judge or Chief District Judge, as appropriate.
(7) When a prisoner is returned to the jail, regional jail, or holdover facility by the
department, the jailer or other person in charge of the jail, regional jail, or holdover
facility shall notify the persons specified in subsection (6) of this section of the
prisoner's return.
(8) The department's costs of providing care, drugs, medications, travel, and all other
expenses authorized by this section shall be a necessary governmental expense.
Page 35 of 35
XXXX 2/3/2026 1:06 PM Jacketed